Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB646.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3314(b) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3314. Prohibiting use of hearing impairment devices.* * *(b) Exception.--This section does not prohibit the use of hearing aids or other devices for improving the hearing of the driver, nor does it prohibit the use of a headset in conjunction with a cellular telephone that only provides sound through one ear and allows surrounding sounds to be heard with the other ear, nor does it prohibit the use of communication equipment by the driver of an emergency vehicle or by motorcycle operators complying with section 3525 (relating to protective equipment for motorcycle riders)[.], nor does it prohibit motorcycle 123456789101112131415161718 operators complying with section 3525 from wearing or using one or more headphones or earphones or protective headgear with the same capabilities.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0646PN0655 - 2 - 1234